Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4703.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406uu. An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall provide coverage for group prenatal care services. As used in this section: (a) "Group prenatal care services" means not more than 12 prenatal care visits provided in a group setting that are based on an evidence-based model. (b) "Group setting" means a group of not fewer than 3 individuals.